dictionaries/sk_SK-ascii.aff
FLAG num
PFX 1402 Y 1
PFX 1402 0 n .
SFX 1403 N 1
SFX 1403 i ere .
SFX 1404 N 1
SFX 1404 i eri .
SFX 1405 N 1
SFX 1405 i erou .
SFX 1406 N 1
SFX 1406 i eriam .
SFX 1407 N 1
SFX 1407 i eriach .
SFX 1408 N 1
SFX 1408 i erami .
SFX 1409 N 1
SFX 1409 0 ere .
SFX 1410 N 1
SFX 1410 0 eri .
SFX 1411 N 1
SFX 1411 0 erou .
SFX 1412 N 1
SFX 1412 0 eriam .
SFX 1413 N 1
SFX 1413 0 eriach .
SFX 1414 N 1
SFX 1414 0 erami .
SFX 1415 Y 1
SFX 1415 a 0 .
PFX 1415 Y 1
PFX 1415 m mi .
SFX 1416 Y 1
SFX 1416 o 0 .
PFX 1416 Y 1
PFX 1416 m mi .
SFX 1417 N 1
SFX 1417 g mog .
SFX 1418 N 1
SFX 1418 iast atiem .
SFX 1419 N 1
SFX 1419 iast aties .
SFX 1420 N 1
SFX 1420 iast atie .
SFX 1421 N 1
SFX 1421 iast atieme .
SFX 1422 N 1
SFX 1422 iast atiete .
SFX 1423 N 1
SFX 1423 iast atu .
SFX 1424 N 1
SFX 1424 iast at .
SFX 1425 N 1
SFX 1425 iast atme .
SFX 1426 N 1
SFX 1426 iast atte .
SFX 1427 N 1
SFX 1427 iast atuc .
SFX 1428 Y 1
SFX 1428 st m .
PFX 1428 Y 1
PFX 1428 m met .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 t 0 .
PFX 1429 Y 1
PFX 1429 m met .
SFX 1430 Y 1
SFX 1430 st 0 .
PFX 1430 Y 1
PFX 1430 m met .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 st me .
PFX 1431 Y 1
PFX 1431 m met .
SFX 1432 Y 1
SFX 1432 st te .
PFX 1432 Y 1
PFX 1432 m met .
SFX 1433 N 1
SFX 1433 aty iat .
SFX 1434 N 1
SFX 1434 i ych .
SFX 1435 N 1
SFX 1435 i ym .
SFX 1436 N 1
SFX 1436 i ymi .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 t m .
PFX 1437 Y 1
PFX 1437 m me .
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 t s .
PFX 1438 Y 1
PFX 1438 m me .
SFX 1439 Y 1
SFX 1439 t 0 .
PFX 1439 Y 1
PFX 1439 m me .
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 t me .
PFX 1440 Y 1
PFX 1440 m me .
SFX 1441 Y 1
SFX 1441 0 e .
PFX 1441 Y 1
PFX 1441 m me .
SFX 1442 N 1
SFX 1442 mnoho viacej .
SFX 1443 N 1
SFX 1443 mnoho viac .
SFX 1444 Y 1
SFX 1444 oho ajviacej .
PFX 1444 Y 1
PFX 1444 m 0 .
SFX 1445 Y 1
SFX 1445 oho ajviac .
PFX 1445 Y 1
PFX 1445 m 0 .
SFX 1446 N 1
SFX 1446 og gu .
SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 og gom .
SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 og gy .
SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 og gov .
SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 og goch .
SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 og gami .
SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 ik kovia .
SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 my nas .
SFX 1454 Y 1
SFX 1454 y 0 .
PFX 1454 Y 1
PFX 1454 0 na .
SFX 1455 Y 1
SFX 1455 y i .
PFX 1455 Y 1
PFX 1455 0 na .
SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 el lou .
SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 el liam .
SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 el liach .
SFX 1459 Y 1
SFX 1459 a 0 .
PFX 1459 Y 1
PFX 1459 m mie .
SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 alo enej .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 alo jmenej .
PFX 1461 Y 1
PFX 1461 0 n .
SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 vec ca .
SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 vec cu .
SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 vec ci .
SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 vec com .
SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 vec ce .
SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 vec cov .
SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 vec coch .
SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 vec cami .
SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 t iel .
SFX 1471 N 1
SFX 1471 k ce .
SFX 1472 N 1
SFX 1472 clovek ludia .
SFX 1473 N 1
SFX 1473 clovek ludi .
SFX 1474 N 1
SFX 1474 clovek ludom .
SFX 1475 N 1
SFX 1475 clovek ludoch .
SFX 1476 N 1
SFX 1476 clovek ludmi .
SFX 1477 Y 1
SFX 1477 0 e .
PFX 1477 Y 1
PFX 1477 nam name .
SFX 1478 N 1
SFX 1478 lat eliem .
SFX 1479 N 1
SFX 1479 lat elies .
SFX 1480 N 1
SFX 1480 lat elie .
SFX 1481 N 1
SFX 1481 lat elieme .
SFX 1482 N 1
SFX 1482 lat eliete .
SFX 1483 N 1
SFX 1483 lat elu .
SFX 1484 N 1
SFX 1484 lat el .
SFX 1485 N 1
SFX 1485 lat elme .
SFX 1486 N 1
SFX 1486 lat elte .
SFX 1487 N 1
SFX 1487 lat eluc .
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 ko sie .
PFX 1488 Y 1
PFX 1488 na nanaj .
SFX 1489 N 1
SFX 1489 iast asiem .
SFX 1490 N 1
SFX 1490 iast asies .
SFX 1491 N 1
SFX 1491 iast asie .
SFX 1492 N 1
SFX 1492 iast asieme .
SFX 1493 N 1
SFX 1493 iast asiete .
SFX 1494 N 1
SFX 1494 iast asu .
SFX 1495 N 1
SFX 1495 iast as .
SFX 1496 N 1
SFX 1496 iast asme .
SFX 1497 N 1
SFX 1497 iast aste .
SFX 1498 N 1
SFX 1498 iast asuc .
SFX 1499 N 1
SFX 1499 esia ies .
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 at ime .
PFX 1500 Y 1
PFX 1500 ne nepo .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 at ite .
PFX 1501 Y 1
PFX 1501 ne nepo .
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 at ia .
PFX 1502 Y 1
PFX 1502 ne nepo .
SFX 1503 Y 1
SFX 1503 at im .
PFX 1503 Y 1
PFX 1503 ne nepo .
SFX 1504 Y 1
SFX 1504 at is .
PFX 1504 Y 1
PFX 1504 ne nepo .
SFX 1505 Y 1
SFX 1505 at i .
PFX 1505 Y 1
PFX 1505 ne nepo .
SFX 1506 N 1
SFX 1506 ebyt ieto .
SFX 1507 N 1
SFX 1507 ebyt iet .
SFX 1508 N 1
SFX 1508 byt ni .
SFX 1509 Y 1
SFX 1509 ovat ujeme .
PFX 1509 Y 1
PFX 1509 ne nepo .
SFX 1510 Y 1
SFX 1510 ovat ujete .
PFX 1510 Y 1
PFX 1510 ne nepo .
SFX 1511 Y 1
SFX 1511 ovat uju .
PFX 1511 Y 1
PFX 1511 ne nepo .
SFX 1512 Y 1
SFX 1512 ovat ujem .
PFX 1512 Y 1
PFX 1512 ne nepo .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 ovat ujes .
PFX 1513 Y 1
PFX 1513 ne nepo .
SFX 1514 Y 1
SFX 1514 ovat uje .
PFX 1514 Y 1
PFX 1514 ne nepo .
SFX 1515 N 1
SFX 1515 ciet tiac .
SFX 1516 N 1
SFX 1516 liet eliete .
SFX 1517 Y 1
SFX 1517 a 0 .
PFX 1517 Y 1
PFX 1517 n ni .
SFX 1518 N 1
SFX 1518 hnat pozenieme .
SFX 1519 N 1
SFX 1519 hnat pozeniete .
SFX 1520 N 1
SFX 1520 hnat pozenu .
SFX 1521 N 1
SFX 1521 hnat pozeniem .
SFX 1522 N 1
SFX 1522 hnat pozenies .
SFX 1523 N 1
SFX 1523 hnat pozenie .
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 ut ieme .
PFX 1524 Y 1
PFX 1524 ne nepo .
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 ut iete .
PFX 1525 Y 1
PFX 1525 ne nepo .
SFX 1526 Y 1
SFX 1526 t 0 .
PFX 1526 Y 1
PFX 1526 ne nepo .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 ut iem .
PFX 1527 Y 1
PFX 1527 ne nepo .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 ut ies .
PFX 1528 Y 1
PFX 1528 ne nepo .
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 ut ie .
PFX 1529 Y 1
PFX 1529 ne nepo .
SFX 1530 N 1
SFX 1530 jst pojdeme .
SFX 1531 N 1
SFX 1531 jst pojdete .
SFX 1532 N 1
SFX 1532 jst pojdu .
SFX 1533 N 1
SFX 1533 jst pojdem .
SFX 1534 N 1
SFX 1534 jst pojdes .
SFX 1535 N 1
SFX 1535 jst pojde .
SFX 1536 N 1
SFX 1536 jst chod .
SFX 1537 N 1
SFX 1537 jst id .
SFX 1538 N 1
SFX 1538 jst pod .
SFX 1539 N 1
SFX 1539 jst podme .
SFX 1540 N 1
SFX 1540 jst chodme .
SFX 1541 N 1
SFX 1541 jst idme .
SFX 1542 N 1
SFX 1542 jst idte .
SFX 1543 N 1
SFX 1543 jst chodte .
SFX 1544 N 1
SFX 1544 jst podte .
SFX 1545 N 1
SFX 1545 jst isiel .
SFX 1546 N 1
SFX 1546 jst isla .
SFX 1547 N 1
SFX 1547 jst islo .
SFX 1548 N 1
SFX 1548 jst isli .
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 ut eme .
PFX 1549 Y 1
PFX 1549 ne nepo .
SFX 1550 Y 1
SFX 1550 ut ete .
PFX 1550 Y 1
PFX 1550 ne nepo .
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 ut em .
PFX 1551 Y 1
PFX 1551 ne nepo .
SFX 1552 Y 1
SFX 1552 ut es .
PFX 1552 Y 1
PFX 1552 ne nepo .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 ut e .
PFX 1553 Y 1
PFX 1553 ne nepo .
SFX 1554 Y 1
SFX 1554 et me .
PFX 1554 Y 1
PFX 1554 ne nepo .
SFX 1555 Y 1
SFX 1555 et te .
PFX 1555 Y 1
PFX 1555 ne nepo .
SFX 1556 Y 1
SFX 1556 et a .
PFX 1556 Y 1
PFX 1556 ne nepo .
SFX 1557 Y 1
SFX 1557 et m .
PFX 1557 Y 1
PFX 1557 ne nepo .
SFX 1558 Y 1
SFX 1558 et s .
PFX 1558 Y 1
PFX 1558 ne nepo .
SFX 1559 Y 1
SFX 1559 et 0 .
PFX 1559 Y 1
PFX 1559 ne nepo .
SFX 1560 N 1
SFX 1560 liezt polezieme .
SFX 1561 N 1
SFX 1561 liezt poleziete .
SFX 1562 N 1
SFX 1562 liezt polezu .
SFX 1563 N 1
SFX 1563 liezt poleziem .
SFX 1564 N 1
SFX 1564 liezt polezies .
SFX 1565 N 1
SFX 1565 liezt polezie .
SFX 1566 Y 1
SFX 1566 0 e .
PFX 1566 Y 1
PFX 1566 nem neme .
SFX 1567 N 1
SFX 1567 niest ponesieme .
SFX 1568 N 1
SFX 1568 niest ponesiete .
SFX 1569 N 1
SFX 1569 niest ponesu .
SFX 1570 N 1
SFX 1570 niest ponesiem .
SFX 1571 Y 1
SFX 1571 t 0 .
PFX 1571 Y 1
PFX 1571 nen nepones .
SFX 1572 N 1
SFX 1572 niest ponesie .
SFX 1573 N 1
SFX 1573 at imem .
SFX 1574 N 1
SFX 1574 at imes .
SFX 1575 N 1
SFX 1575 at imeme .
SFX 1576 N 1
SFX 1576 at imete .
SFX 1577 N 1
SFX 1577 at imu .
SFX 1578 N 1
SFX 1578 at imme .
SFX 1579 N 1
SFX 1579 at imte .
SFX 1580 N 1
SFX 1580 at imuc .
SFX 1581 N 1
SFX 1581 ast ediem .
SFX 1582 N 1
SFX 1582 ast edas .
SFX 1583 N 1
SFX 1583 ast die .
SFX 1584 N 1
SFX 1584 ast edame .
SFX 1585 N 1
SFX 1585 ast edate .
SFX 1586 N 1
SFX 1586 ast du .
SFX 1587 N 1
SFX 1587 ast d .
SFX 1588 N 1
SFX 1588 ast edme .
SFX 1589 N 1
SFX 1589 ast edte .
SFX 1590 N 1
SFX 1590 ast educ .
SFX 1591 N 1
SFX 1591 echa iech .
SFX 1592 N 1
SFX 1592 knut ol .
SFX 1593 N 1
SFX 1593 knut la .
SFX 1594 N 1
SFX 1594 knut lo .
SFX 1595 N 1
SFX 1595 knut li .
SFX 1596 Y 1
SFX 1596 t me .
PFX 1596 Y 1
PFX 1596 ne nepo .
SFX 1597 Y 1
SFX 1597 0 e .
PFX 1597 Y 1
PFX 1597 ne nepo .
SFX 1598 Y 1
SFX 1598 t ju .
PFX 1598 Y 1
PFX 1598 ne nepo .
SFX 1599 Y 1
SFX 1599 t m .
PFX 1599 Y 1
PFX 1599 ne nepo .
SFX 1600 Y 1
SFX 1600 t s .
PFX 1600 Y 1
PFX 1600 ne nepo .
SFX 1601 N 1
SFX 1601 t vem .
SFX 1602 N 1
SFX 1602 t ves .
SFX 1603 N 1
SFX 1603 t ve .
SFX 1604 N 1
SFX 1604 t veme .
SFX 1605 N 1
SFX 1605 t vete .
SFX 1606 N 1
SFX 1606 t vu .
SFX 1607 N 1
SFX 1607 t vuc .
SFX 1608 N 1
SFX 1608 nat jmem .
SFX 1609 N 1
SFX 1609 nat jmes .
SFX 1610 N 1
SFX 1610 nat jme .
SFX 1611 N 1
SFX 1611 nat jmeme .
SFX 1612 N 1
SFX 1612 nat jmete .
SFX 1613 N 1
SFX 1613 nat jmu .
SFX 1614 N 1
SFX 1614 nat jmi .
SFX 1615 N 1
SFX 1615 nat jmime .
SFX 1616 N 1
SFX 1616 nat jmite .
SFX 1617 N 1
SFX 1617 nat jmuc .
SFX 1618 N 1
SFX 1618 ziat ezmem .
SFX 1619 N 1
SFX 1619 ziat ezmes .
SFX 1620 N 1
SFX 1620 ziat ezme .
SFX 1621 N 1
SFX 1621 ziat ezmeme .
SFX 1622 N 1
SFX 1622 ziat ezmete .
SFX 1623 N 1
SFX 1623 ziat ezmu .
SFX 1624 N 1
SFX 1624 ziat ezmi .
SFX 1625 N 1
SFX 1625 ziat ezmime .
SFX 1626 N 1
SFX 1626 ziat ezmite .
SFX 1627 N 1
SFX 1627 ziat ezmuc .
SFX 1628 N 1
SFX 1628 iat al .
SFX 1629 N 1
SFX 1629 iat ala .
SFX 1630 N 1
SFX 1630 iat alo .
SFX 1631 N 1
SFX 1631 iat ali .
SFX 1632 N 1
SFX 1632 iezt esiez .
SFX 1633 N 1
SFX 1633 iezt esieme .
SFX 1634 N 1
SFX 1634 iezt esiete .
SFX 1635 N 1
SFX 1635 rsat oprsime .
SFX 1636 N 1
SFX 1636 rsat oprsite .
SFX 1637 N 1
SFX 1637 rsat oprsia .
SFX 1638 N 1
SFX 1638 rsat oprsim .
SFX 1639 N 1
SFX 1639 rsat oprsis .
SFX 1640 N 1
SFX 1640 rsat oprsi .
SFX 1641 N 1
SFX 1641 utovat oputujeme .
SFX 1642 N 1
SFX 1642 utovat oputujete .
SFX 1643 N 1
SFX 1643 utovat oputuju .
SFX 1644 N 1
SFX 1644 utovat oputujem .
SFX 1645 N 1
SFX 1645 utovat oputujes .
SFX 1646 N 1
SFX 1646 utovat oputuje .
SFX 1647 N 1
SFX 1647 tat otnem .
SFX 1648 N 1
SFX 1648 tat otnes .
SFX 1649 N 1
SFX 1649 tat otne .
SFX 1650 N 1
SFX 1650 tat otneme .
SFX 1651 N 1
SFX 1651 tat otnete .
SFX 1652 N 1
SFX 1652 tat otnu .
SFX 1653 N 1
SFX 1653 tat otni .
SFX 1654 N 1
SFX 1654 tat otnime .
SFX 1655 N 1
SFX 1655 tat otnite .
SFX 1656 N 1
SFX 1656 tat otnuc .
SFX 1657 N 1
SFX 1657 0 sej .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 sej .
PFX 1658 Y 1
PFX 1658 0 naj .
SFX 1659 Y 1
SFX 1659 0 ieme .
PFX 1659 Y 1
PFX 1659 ne nepo .
SFX 1660 Y 1
SFX 1660 0 iete .
PFX 1660 Y 1
PFX 1660 ne nepo .
SFX 1661 Y 1
SFX 1661 0 u .
PFX 1661 Y 1
PFX 1661 ne nepo .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 0 iem .
PFX 1662 Y 1
PFX 1662 ne nepo .
SFX 1663 Y 1
SFX 1663 0 ies .
PFX 1663 Y 1
PFX 1663 ne nepo .
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 0 ie .
PFX 1664 Y 1
PFX 1664 ne nepo .
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 t a .
PFX 1665 Y 1
PFX 1665 ne nepo .
SFX 1666 Y 1
SFX 1666 o 0 .
PFX 1666 Y 1
PFX 1666 0 naj .
SFX 1667 N 1
SFX 1667 zt hol .
SFX 1668 N 1
SFX 1668 zt hla .
SFX 1669 N 1
SFX 1669 zt hlo .
SFX 1670 N 1
SFX 1670 zt hli .
SFX 1671 N 1
SFX 1671 at zem .
SFX 1672 N 1
SFX 1672 at zes .
SFX 1673 N 1
SFX 1673 at ze .
SFX 1674 N 1
SFX 1674 at zeme .
SFX 1675 N 1
SFX 1675 at zete .
SFX 1676 N 1
SFX 1676 at zu .
SFX 1677 N 1
SFX 1677 at zuc .
SFX 1678 N 1
SFX 1678 iet z .
SFX 1679 N 1
SFX 1679 iet zme .
SFX 1680 N 1
SFX 1680 iet zte .
SFX 1681 N 1
SFX 1681 viest povedieme .
SFX 1682 N 1
SFX 1682 viest povediete .
SFX 1683 N 1
SFX 1683 viest povedu .
SFX 1684 N 1
SFX 1684 viest povediem .
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 t 0 .
PFX 1685 Y 1
PFX 1685 nev nepoved .
SFX 1686 N 1
SFX 1686 viest povedie .
SFX 1687 N 1
SFX 1687 viezt povezieme .
SFX 1688 N 1
SFX 1688 viezt poveziete .
SFX 1689 N 1
SFX 1689 viezt povezu .
SFX 1690 N 1
SFX 1690 viezt poveziem .
SFX 1691 N 1
SFX 1691 viezt povezies .
SFX 1692 N 1
SFX 1692 viezt povezie .
SFX 1693 N 1
SFX 1693 vliect povlecieme .
SFX 1694 N 1
SFX 1694 vliect povleciete .
SFX 1695 N 1
SFX 1695 vliect povlecu .
SFX 1696 N 1
SFX 1696 vliect povleciem .
SFX 1697 N 1
SFX 1697 vliect povlecies .
SFX 1698 N 1
SFX 1698 vliect povlecie .
SFX 1699 N 1
SFX 1699 ba d .
SFX 1700 N 1
SFX 1700 ist pojdeme .
